Nebraska, session 109, LB1142.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1142 LB1142
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 53-501, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-501 (1) The Nebraska Craft Brewery Board is created. All board
members shall be (a) citizens of Nebraska, (b) at least twenty-one years
of age, and (c) either engaged in or previously engaged in the
manufacture or the wholesale or retail sale of beer in this state or
engaged or previously engaged in the production in this state of
agricultural products that are utilized in the brewing process. The board
shall consist of seven members to be appointed by the Governor on a
nonpartisan basis. At least two board members shall be selected by the
Governor from a list of no fewer than ten candidates submitted by the
Nebraska Craft Brewers Guild or its successor organization. In addition,
at least two board members shall be selected by the Governor from a list
of no fewer than ten candidates submitted by the Associated Beverage
Distributors of Nebraska or its successor organization. The Director of
Agriculture or his or her designee and the Director of Tourism of the
Department of Economic Development executive director of the Nebraska
Tourism Commission or his or her designee shall be nonvoting, ex officio
members of the board.
(2) Whenever a vacancy occurs on the board for any reason, the
Governor shall appoint an individual to fill such vacancy pursuant to the
qualifications set forth in subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 2. Section 77-3012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3012 (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this
section, a tax is hereby imposed and levied, in the amount and in
accordance with this section, upon the net operating revenue of all cash
devices operating within the State of Nebraska for profit or gain either
directly or indirectly received. The tax shall be paid in the amount and
manner specified in this section.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section,
-2-

LB1142 LB1142
2026 2026
beginning on and after July 1, 2025, any distributor of a cash device,
and any operator of a cash device if the operator is not subject to a
revenue-sharing or other agreement with a distributor who is paying the
tax, shall pay a tax for each cash device in operation each calendar
quarter during the taxable year. The tax shall be collected by the
department and due and payable on January 1, April 1, July 1, and October
1 of each year on each cash device in operation during the preceding
calendar quarter. For each cash device put into operation on a date
subsequent to a quarterly due date that has not been included in
computing the tax imposed and levied by the Mechanical Amusement Device
Tax Act, the tax shall be due and payable on the immediately succeeding
quarterly due date.
(3) The amount of the tax imposed and levied under this section
shall be five percent of the net operating revenue for each cash device.
The quarterly tax shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner documenting the total gross and net operating revenue for
that quarter.
(4) The Tax Commissioner shall remit the taxes collected pursuant to
this section to the State Treasurer for credit as follows:
(a) Twenty percent to the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund for
enforcement of the act and maintenance of the central server;
(b) Two and one-half percent to the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance
Fund;
(c) Two and one-half percent to the General Fund;
(d) Ten percent to the Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional Cash
Fund;
(e) Forty percent to the Property Tax Credit Cash Fund; and
(f) The remaining twenty-five percent to the county treasurer of the
county in which the cash device is located to be distributed as follows:
(i) If the cash device is located completely within an unincorporated
area of a county, the remaining twenty-five percent shall be distributed
-3-

LB1142 LB1142
2026 2026
to the county in which the cash device is located, or (ii) if the cash
device is located within the limits of a city or village in such county,
one-half of the remaining twenty-five percent shall be distributed to
such county and one-half of the remaining twenty-five percent shall be
distributed to the city or village in which such cash device is located.
(5) This section does not apply to cash devices operated by a
fraternal benefit society organized and licensed under sections 44-1072
to 44-10,109 or a recognized veterans organization as defined in section
80-401.01.
Sec. 3. Section 81-3701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3701 Sections 81-3701 to 81-3730 and sections 6 and 8 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Visitors Development Act.
Sec. 4. Section 81-3702, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3702 The purposes of the Nebraska Visitors Development Act are
(1) to create the Nebraska Tourism Commission to promote Nebraska as a
tourism destination and to administer programs to attract an increasing
number of visitors to Nebraska and further the use of travel and tourism
facilities in Nebraska, (2) to provide for a lodging tax on hotels for
the purpose of establishing a State Visitors Promotion Cash Fund, and (3)
to authorize the governing body of any county to appoint a visitors
committee and impose a lodging tax on hotels for the purpose of
establishing a County Visitors Promotion Fund and a County Visitors
Improvement Fund.
Sec. 5. Section 81-3703, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3703 For purposes of the Nebraska Visitors Development Act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections
81-3704 to 81-3709.01 and section 6 of this act apply.
Sec. 6. Department means the Department of Economic Development.
-4-

LB1142 LB1142
2026 2026
Sec. 7. Section 81-3706.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3706.01 Highway tourism marker means a marker of a particular
style authorized by the department commission to designate tourism
attractions.
Sec. 8. (1) The department shall administer the Nebraska Visitors
Development Act and shall have the authority to:
(a) Employ personnel and contract for services as needed to carry
out the department's duties under the act;
(b) Procure and evaluate data and information necessary for the
proper administration of the act;
(c) Develop and approve state marketing campaigns;
(d) Develop and administer a program to provide promotional
services, technical assistance, and state aid to local governments and
the tourism industry;
(e) Cooperate with federal, state, and local governments and private
individuals and organizations to carry out any of the functions of the
department and purposes of the Nebraska Visitors Development Act; and
(f) Actively coordinate and develop working partnerships with other
state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Commission on Indian
Affairs, the Game and Parks Commission, the Nebraska Arts Council, the
Nebraska State Historical Society, and the University of Nebraska.
(2) The Director of Economic Development shall appoint a Director of
Tourism at a salary fixed by the Director of Economic Development. The
Director of Tourism shall serve at the pleasure of the Director of
Economic Development.
(3) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out the Nebraska Visitors Development Act.
Sec. 9. Section 81-3710, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3710 (1) The Nebraska Tourism Commission is created. For
-5-

LB1142 LB1142
2026 2026
administrative purposes, the commission shall be located and staffed
within the department.
(2) The members of the commission shall consist of the Director of
Economic Development and twelve residents of the State of Nebraska
appointed by the Governor, to include one member representing a state
chamber of commerce organized under the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation
Act, and one member appointed from each of the eleven districts described
in subsection (3) (2) of this section. The members appointed by the
Governor shall be subject to approval by the majority of the members of
the Legislature. The term of the member representing a state chamber of
commerce shall be four years, and the terms of the district members shall
be as provided in subdivision (3)(b) (2)(b) of this section. No appointed
member may serve more than two successive terms. Four of the district
members shall have professional, volunteer, or public service experience
that contributes to the fiduciary and governance duties of the
commission. Seven of the district members shall be affiliated with the
tourism industry.
(3)(a) (2)(a) For purposes of this section, the state is hereby
divided into eleven districts. The limits and designations of the eleven
districts shall be as follows:
(i) District No. 1. Douglas County;
(ii) District No. 2. Lancaster County;
(iii) District No. 3. The counties of Richardson, Pawnee, Nemaha,
Johnson, Otoe, Gage, Saline, and Jefferson;
(iv) District No. 4. The counties of Cass and Sarpy;
(v) District No. 5. The counties of Saunders, Washington, Dodge,
Colfax, Stanton, Cuming, Burt, Thurston, Wayne, Cedar, Dixon, and Dakota;
(vi) District No. 6. The counties of Butler, Polk, Platte, Merrick,
Nance, Boone, Madison, Pierce, Antelope, Knox, Holt, and Boyd;
(vii) District No. 7. The counties of Thayer, Nuckolls, Webster,
Adams, Clay, Fillmore, Seward, York, Hamilton, Franklin, and Harlan;
-6-

LB1142 LB1142
2026 2026
(viii) District No. 8. The counties of Kearney, Phelps, Hall,
Howard, Greeley, Wheeler, Buffalo, Sherman, Valley, and Garfield;
(ix) District No. 9. The counties of Lincoln, Keya Paha, Rock,
Brown, Loup, Blaine, Custer, Logan, McPherson, Arthur, Grant, Hooker,
Thomas, and Cherry;
(x) District No. 10. The counties of Furnas, Red Willow, Hitchcock,
Dundy, Chase, Hayes, Frontier, Gosper, Dawson, Perkins, and Keith; and
(xi) District No. 11. The counties of Deuel, Garden, Sheridan,
Cheyenne, Morrill, Box Butte, Dawes, Sioux, Scotts Bluff, Banner, and
Kimball.
(b) The Governor shall appoint members representing district numbers
1, 6, 8, and 11 to serve for terms ending April 1, 2019; members
representing district numbers 2, 5, 7, and 10 to serve for terms ending
April 1, 2021; and members representing district numbers 3, 4, and 9 to
serve for terms ending April 1, 2023. The terms of their successors shall
be four years.
Sec. 10. Section 81-3711, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3711 The commission shall:
(1) Advise the department in its administration of Administer the
Nebraska Visitors Development Act;
(2) Prepare and approve a budget;
(2) (3) Elect a chairperson and vice-chairperson;
(3) Recommend a Director of Tourism for appointment by the Director
of Economic Development;
(4) Procure and evaluate data and information necessary for the
proper administration of the act;
(5) Appoint an executive director at a salary to be fixed by the
commission to conduct the day-to-day operations of the commission;
(6) Employ personnel and contract for services which are necessary
for the proper operation of the commission;
-7-

LB1142 LB1142
2026 2026
(4) (7) Establish a means by which any interested person has the
opportunity at least annually to offer his or her ideas and suggestions
relative to the Nebraska Visitors Development Act commission's duties for
the upcoming year; and
(8) Authorize the expenditure of funds and contracting of
expenditures to carry out the act;
(5) (9) Keep minutes of its meetings and other books and records
which clearly reflect all of the actions and transactions of the
commission and keep such records open to examination during normal
business hours. ;
(10) Prohibit any funds appropriated to the commission from being
expended directly or indirectly to promote or oppose any candidate for
public office or to influence state or federal legislation;
(11) Have authority to mark significant tourism attractions as
provided in section 81-3711.01;
(12) Have authority to develop and approve state marketing
campaigns;
(13) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the
Nebraska Visitors Development Act;
(14) Develop and administer a program to provide promotional
services, technical assistance, and state aid to local governments and
the tourism industry;
(15) Establish written policies and procedures governing the
executive director and the personnel of the commission in the expenditure
and use of funds appropriated to the commission;
(16) Cooperate with federal, state, and local governments and
private individuals and organizations to carry out any of the functions
of the commission and purposes of the Nebraska Visitors Development Act;
and
(17) Actively coordinate and develop working partnerships with other
state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Commission on Indian
-8-

LB1142 LB1142
2026 2026
Affairs, the Department of Economic Development, the Game and Parks
Commission, the Nebraska Arts Council, the Nebraska State Historical
Society, and the University of Nebraska.
Sec. 11. Section 81-3711.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-3711.01 (1) The department commission may mark significant
tourism attractions in Nebraska.
(2) The department commission may (a) determine what tourism
attractions are significant to the State of Nebraska, (b) expend funds
for the purchase of highway tourism markers, (c) designate the
approximate location of highway tourism markers, (d) preserve, replace,
or modify highway tourism markers, and (e) accept gifts and encourage
local participation in and contribution to the erection of highway
tourism markers through the use of gifts and matching-fund agreements.
Such funds shall be deposited into the State Visitors Promotion Cash
Fund. The department commission shall not expend funds for the purchase
of highway tourism markers until funding has been secured through gifts
or otherwise.
(3) The department commission may appoint and delegate to a special
committee the duties of research and investigation to assist in the
determination of tourism attractions that should be designated by highway
tourism markers. The Department of Transportation shall erect and
maintain highway tourism markers and shall determine the exact location
of highway tourism markers with consideration given for the safety and
welfare of the public.
(4) The department commission may secure payment to the state for
the actual replacement cost of any highway tourism markers damaged or
destroyed, accidentally or otherwise. Any funds so collected shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the State Visitors
Promotion Cash Fund for the procurement of highway tourism markers.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the
-9-

LB1142 LB1142
2026 2026
placement of any marker or signage on private property.
Sec. 12. Section 81-3712, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3712 For purposes of transition, employees of the commission
Travel and Tourism Division of the Department of Economic Development
shall be considered employees of the department commission and shall
retain their rights under the state personnel system or pertinent
bargaining agreement, and their service shall be deemed continuous. This
section does not grant employees any new rights or benefits not otherwise
provided by law or bargaining agreement or preclude the department
commission from exercising any of the prerogatives of management set
forth in section 81-1311 or as otherwise provided by law. This section is
not an amendment to or substitute for the provisions of any existing
bargaining agreements.
Sec. 13. Section 81-3713, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3713 The department commission shall develop a statewide
strategic plan to cultivate and promote tourism in Nebraska. The
department commission shall review the plan annually and update as
necessary. The plan shall include:
(1) A review of revenue in the State Visitors Promotion Cash Fund
available for tourism development at the state level;
(2) An examination of best management practices for the tourism
industry;
(3) Marketing strategies for promoting tourism;
(4) Methods to expand existing tourism capacity which may include
encouraging regional cooperation, collaboration, or privatization; and
(5) Recommended strategies to provide technical assistance,
marketing services, and state aid to local governments and the tourism
industry in Nebraska.
Sec. 14. Section 81-3714, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-10-

LB1142 LB1142
2026 2026
amended to read:
81-3714 The State Visitors Promotion Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall be administered by the department commission. The fund shall
consist of revenue deposited into the fund pursuant to section 81-3715
and money donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions from public
or private entities. Funds made available by any department or agency of
the United States may also be credited to the fund if so directed by such
department or agency. The department commission shall use the proceeds of
the fund to generally promote and market the State of Nebraska, to
encourage, and attract visitors to and within the State of Nebraska, to
erect and replace highway tourism markers, to enhance the use of travel
and tourism facilities within the state, and to provide grants to
communities and organizations , and to contract with the Department of
Administrative Services to provide support services to the commission,
including, but not limited to, accounting and personnel functions. The
proceeds of the fund shall be in addition to funds appropriated to the
department commission from the General Fund. Transfers may be made from
the State Visitors Promotion Cash Fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. The State Treasurer shall transfer one
million dollars from the State Visitors Promotion Cash Fund to the
General Fund on or before June 30, 2019, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services. Any money in the State
Visitors Promotion Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning
October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the
fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 15. Section 81-3721, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3721 All contracts awarded by the department commission shall be
-11-

LB1142 LB1142
2026 2026
subject to the State Procurement Act. The department commission shall
comply with the rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines
established by the Department of Administrative Services for contracts.
Sec. 16. Section 81-3725, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-3725 (1) The department commission shall develop a program to
provide marketing assistance grants to communities and organizations
hosting national or international-caliber events held in Nebraska that
have the potential to attract a significant percentage of out-of-state
visitors and to generate favorable national or international press
coverage for Nebraska.
(2) A community or organization applying for a marketing assistance
grant shall provide a plan to the department commission that includes:
(a) Documentation that the event will attract out-of-state visitors; (b)
details regarding the type of marketing that would be carried out with
state funds; (c) methodologies used to track the impact of marketing
efforts and the number of out-of-state visitors attending the event; and
(d) details regarding the potential national or international press
coverage that will be generated by the event.
(3)(a) The department commission shall develop a program to provide
innovative tourism grants to communities or organizations that provide
tourism and visitor promotion services, host events, or promote
attractions that result in either (i) an increased number of nonlocal,
instate visitors or (ii) an increased number of both nonlocal, instate
visitors and out-of-state visitors. Innovative tourism grants may
include, but not be limited to, marketing assistance, planning
assistance, basic support, and regional cooperation. Innovative tourism
grants shall not be used for equipment or capital facility development or
improvements.
(b) When awarding innovative tourism grants under the program, the
department commission shall award up to five hundred thousand dollars in
-12-

LB1142 LB1142
2026 2026
innovative tourism grants to any such city or village each fiscal year.
(4) The Director of Tourism executive director shall convene a
technical review committee of no fewer than three individuals
representing the public sector, the private sector, and citizens at
large. The technical review committee, the Director of Tourism, and the
Director of Economic Development and the executive director shall review
and score applications for marketing assistance grants and innovative
tourism grants and forward recommendations to the department commission
for approval by the department commission or a subcommittee of the
commission.
(5) Communities and organizations receiving marketing assistance
grants or innovative tourism grants authorized under this section shall
provide a final report to the department commission within ninety days
after the completion date of the event that includes event attendance,
the use of funds, and marketing impact information.
(6) The department commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations governing the grant programs authorized under this section.
Sec. 17. Section 81-3726, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3726 The Tourism Conference Cash Fund is created. The fund shall
be administered by the department commission. All sums of money received
from fees from any conference or event held by the department commission
shall be deposited in the fund. The department commission shall use the
fund to defray expenses related to any conference or event sponsored by
the department commission. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
Sec. 18. Section 81-3728, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3728 (1) Vendors under contract with the department commission to
-13-

LB1142 LB1142
2026 2026
develop, print, and distribute publications and promotional materials or
produce, sell, and distribute tourism promotional products on behalf of
the department commission shall, on a monthly basis, submit to the
department commission all revenue received from the sale of advertising
space in such publications or from the sale of such tourism promotional
products. Monthly submissions shall include an itemization of the sources
of revenue in a format as designated by the department commission.
Revenue from such sales shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional Cash Fund.
(2) The department commission may enter into agreements directly
with retailers to sell tourism promotional products. If a retailer pays
for such products in full at the time of acquisition, the retailer shall
have no further reporting requirements. The department commission shall
remit payments received from retailers acquiring such products to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional
Cash Fund.
Sec. 19. Section 81-3729, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3729 The Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional Cash Fund is
hereby created. The fund shall consist of revenue submitted by vendors
and retailers under section 81-3728 and revenue from the tax collected on
the net operating revenue of cash devices pursuant to section 77-3012.
Revenue from the sale of advertising shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the fund. The department commission shall use the
fund to carry out its purposes under the Nebraska Visitors Development
Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 20. Section 81-3730, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3730 The department commission is authorized to develop and make
-14-

LB1142 LB1142
2026 2026
available for sale directly to the public tourism promotional products
related to state marketing campaigns developed and approved by the
department commission. The department commission may contract with
private vendors to produce, sell, and distribute such tourism promotional
products or enter into agreements directly with retailers as provided in
section 81-3728. Any revenue from the sale of such tourism promotional
products shall be credited to the Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional
Cash Fund as provided in section 81-3728.
Sec. 21. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 22. Original sections 53-501, 81-3701, 81-3702, 81-3703,
81-3706.01, 81-3710, 81-3711, 81-3711.01, 81-3712, 81-3713, 81-3714,
81-3721, 81-3726, 81-3728, 81-3729, and 81-3730, Reissue Revised Statutes
of Nebraska, section 77-3012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, and section 81-3725, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
repealed.
Sec. 23. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-15-